Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB412.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3105(a)(4) and (c) of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 3105. Association group life insurance for Pennsylvania National Guard.(a) Voluntary participation for group life insurance.--The Adjutant General may approve issuance of group life insurance to nonprofit membership associations for members of the Pennsylvania National Guard, subject to the following requirements:* * *(4) The amounts of insurance under the policy must not exceed [$400,000] the maximum available Servicemembers' Group 123456789101112131415161718 Life Insurance coverage per individual insured member and [$100,000] per insured spouse or dependent.* * *(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "eligible member of the Pennsylvania National Guard" shall mean:(1) members of the Pennsylvania National Guard ordered to active Federal service for a period of 30 or more consecutive days while preparing to deploy, deployed and demobilizing from deployment, to areas or operations designated by the Secretary of Defense as "zones of combat" or "combat operations"; [and](2) members of the Pennsylvania National Guard ordered to active State duty for emergencies under section 508 (relating to active duty for emergency) or 35 Pa.C.S. § 7601 (relating to compact enacted) for a period of 30 or more consecutive days[.]; and(3) members of the Pennsylvania National Guard ordered to active duty for a period of 30 or more consecutive days under 32 U.S.C. (relating to National Guard) orders, status or duty in response to an emergency declaration or Federal mobilization with the approval of the Governor and the United States Secretary of Defense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0412PN0384 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223